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DTC P0776/63 Pressure Control Solenoid ”B” Performance
(Shift Solenoid Valve SL2)

SYSTEM DESCRIPTION
The Engine and ECT ECU uses signals from the vehicle speed sensor and direct clutch speed sensor to
detect the actual gear range(1st, 2nd, 3rd, 4th or 5th gear). Then the Engine and ECT ECU compares the
actual gear with the shift schedule in the Engine and ECT ECU memory to detect mechanical troubles of
the shift solenoid valves, valve body or automatic transmission (clutch, brake or gear etc.).

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0776/63
The gear required by the Engine and ECT ECU does not
match the actual gear when driving (2−trip detection logic)

S Shift solenoid valve SL2 is stuck open or closed
S Valve body is blocked up or stuck
S Automatic transmission (clutch, brake or gear etc.)

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check shift solenoid valve SL2 operation.

PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Remove the shift solenoid valve SL2.
CHECK:
(a) Measure the resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of so-

lenoid connector.
Standard: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

(b) Connect the positive (+) lead with an 21 W bulb to terminal
2 of solenoid connector and negative (−) lead to terminal
1 of the solenoid valve connector, then check the move-
ment of the valve.
Standard: Solenoid sounds operation noise.

OK:
Standard

NG Replace shift solenoid valve SL2 (See page
AT−8) .

OK
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2 Check valve body (See page DI−26).

NG Repair or replace valve body (See page
AT−8) .

OK

Repair or replace transmission
(See page AT−31).


